Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 295 of Title 17, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Firming power” means power sources that can provide at


least forty-eight (48) hours of back-up power to intermittent


generation at the expected maximum level of power provided by the



Req. No. 59 Page 1


intermittent generation, predicted using an industry-standard


methodology;


2. “Guaranteed power capacity” means the sum of the on-demand


power and firming power available, calculated without double-


counting any power source;


3. “Intermittent generation” means electric generation that


requires intermittent sources of energy such as sunlight or wind;


4. “On-demand power” means electric power from sources that do


not depend on intermittent sources of energy such as sunlight or


wind and whose output can be provided within eight (8) hours and


controlled to meet changes in demand. Provided, on-demand power


does not include electric power from batteries or other storage


mechanisms that are charged in whole or in part by intermittent


generation; and


5. “Peak net load” means the estimated peak demand minus the


estimated minimum level of power provided by intermittent generation


at the time of peak demand, predicted using an industry-standard


methodology.


B. The Corporation Commission shall promulgate rules and


procedures to ensure that any electric grid serving ratepayers in


this state is affordable and reliable as set forth in this act.


C. An electric grid shall not be considered affordable and


reliable unless:



Req. No. 59 Page 2


1. Any new power generation resource is chosen and approved


based solely on achieving the lowest total monetary cost among


available options. The lowest total monetary cost shall be


calculated by adding the total monetary cost of construction and


operation of such resource that will be charged to ratepayers, the


fiscal costs to any level of government of direct and indirect


monetary subsidies applicable to such resource, the monetary cost of


providing firming power if required by this act or otherwise, and


other system costs necessary to integrate the resource;


2. Existing power generation resources are not retired prior to


the end of their potential useful lives, including where such useful


lives can be extended through repairs or other modifications, unless


retirement results in a lower total monetary cost among available


options and the requirements of subsection E of this section are


met;


3. The grid maintains a guaranteed power capacity of at least


one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of peak net load;


4. Power generation resources serving the grid meet continuous


operating requirements for summer and winter peaks, including


extreme weather events that necessitate on-site fuel storage, dual


fuel capability, or fuel supply arrangements to ensure performance


for seven (7) days in the event of extreme weather; and


5. System-wide loss of load events, such as power shortages or


brownouts, are not expected to occur, to an industry-standard level

Req. No. 59 Page 3


of certainty, more than once in ten (10) years, and for a duration


of five (5) hours or fewer.


D. The Corporation Commission shall not take any action


approving a new intermittent generation source unless the source has


the support of firming power up to the expected maximum output level


of the source for forty-eight (48) hours during periods of peak load


on the grid, and the cost of constructing or contracting for that


firming power shall be included in calculating the total monetary


cost of the intermittent generation source.


E. Guaranteed power capacity shall be a primary consideration


of the Corporation Commission when considering matters related to


the retiring or adding of electric generation. The Commission shall


not approve retiring any electric generation source that provides


on-demand power, including by approving a certificate of convenience


or a permit to build or acquire intermittent generation, unless the


utility establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that the


applicable electric grid will have, at the time of retirement, a


guaranteed power capacity equal to or greater than described in


paragraph 3 of subsection C of this section.


F. The Corporation Commission shall coordinate with regional


transmission organizations to develop policies which provide power


for the region in a cost-effective manner that is not weather-


dependent, can be controlled to meet changes in demand, and meets


the requirements prescribed by this section.

Req. No. 59 Page 4


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-59 RD 1/16/2025 2:19:54 PM











































Req. No. 59 Page 5